Illinois, session 104th, HB3984.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 65/1)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1251)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Illinois Affordable Housing Act".9(Source: P.A. 86-925.)